Indiana, session 2026, HB1299.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 35-31.5-2-78, AS AMENDED BY P.L.175-2022,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 78. "Crime of domestic violence", for purposes of
IC 5-2-6.1, IC 35-38-9, IC 35-47-2-1.5, and IC 35-47-4-7, IC 35-47-4,
means an offense or the attempt to commit an offense that:
(1) has as an element the:
(A) use of physical force; or
(B) threatened use of a deadly weapon; and
(2) is committed against a family or household member, as
defined in section 128 of this chapter.
SECTION 2. IC 35-31.5-2-103.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 103.3. "Domestic batterer", for
purposes of IC 35-47-4-6.3, has the meaning set forth in
IC 35-47-4-6.3(a)(2).
SECTION 3. IC 35-31.5-2-183, AS AMENDED BY P.L.127-2025,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
2026 IN 1299—LS 6347/DI 144


JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 183. (a) "Law enforcement agency," for purposes
of receiving information concerning a violation of IC 35-42-3.5-1
through IC 35-42-3.5-1.4 (human trafficking), means:
(1) an agency or department of:
(A) the state; or
(B) a political subdivision of the state;
whose principal function is the apprehension of criminal
offenders; and
(2) the attorney general.
(b) "Law enforcement agency", for purposes of IC 35-33-4.5,
IC 35-47-4, and IC 35-47-15, has the meaning set forth in
IC 35-47-15-2.
SECTION 4. IC 35-31.5-2-187.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 187.2. "License", for purposes of
IC 35-47-4-6.3 and IC 35-47-4-6.4, has the meaning set forth in
IC 35-47-4-6.3(a)(3).
SECTION 5. IC 35-31.5-2-275.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 275.5. "Residence", for purposes
of IC 35-47-4-6.3, has the meaning set forth in IC 35-47-4-6.3(a)(4).
SECTION 6. IC 35-31.5-2-319.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 319.5. "Surrender", for purposes
of IC 35-47-4-6.3 and IC 35-47-4-6.4, has the meaning set forth in
IC 35-47-4-6.3(a)(5).
SECTION 7. IC 35-47-4-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.118-2007,
SECTION 36, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) A person who has been convicted of:
(1) domestic battery under IC 35-42-2-1.3; or
(2) a crime of domestic violence (as defined in
IC 35-31.5-2-78);
and who knowingly or intentionally possesses a firearm commits
unlawful possession of a firearm by a domestic batterer, a Class A
misdemeanor.
(b) It is a defense to a prosecution under this section that:
(1) the person's right to possess a firearm has been restored under
IC 35-47-4-7. section 7 of this chapter; or
(2) the person, at the time of the commission of the offense,
was:
(A) subject to a written court order under section 6.4(a) of
this chapter; and
2026 IN 1299—LS 6347/DI 144


(B) awaiting the confiscation of the firearm by an
appropriate law enforcement agency or law enforcement
officer as described in section 6.4(b) of this chapter.
SECTION 8. IC 35-47-4-6.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 6.3. (a) The following definitions apply throughout
this section:
(1) "Crime of domestic violence" has the meaning set forth in
IC 35-31.5-2-78.
(2) "Domestic batterer" means a person:
(A) who has been convicted of domestic battery (IC
35-42-2-1.3) or a crime of domestic violence; and
(B) whose right to possess a firearm has not been restored
under section 7 of this chapter.
(3) "License" means any license or permit to carry a
handgun.
(4) "Residence" means one (1) or more of the following:
(A) The location where a person spends most of the
person's time, including a residence owned or leased by
another person if the person:
(i) does not own or lease a residence; or
(ii) spends more time at the residence owned or leased by
the other person than at the residence owned or leased
by the person.
(B) A particular location where a person spends more than
three (3) nights in a thirty (30) day period.
(5) "Surrender" means to make available for confiscation by
a law enforcement agency or law enforcement officer having
jurisdiction over one (1) or more of the following:
(A) The location of the offense.
(B) The location of the defendant's residence at any time
between the defendant's arrest and the conclusion of the
defendant's sentence.
(b) A domestic batterer who knowingly or intentionally fails to
surrender any:
(1) firearm; or
(2) license;
owned or possessed by the domestic batterer commits unlawful
retention of a firearm or license by a domestic batterer, a Class A
misdemeanor. However, the offense is a Level 6 felony if the person
has a prior unrelated conviction for an offense under this section.
(c) It is a defense to a prosecution under this section that:
2026 IN 1299—LS 6347/DI 144


(1) a court did not issue a written order described in section
6.4(a) of this chapter before the domestic batterer's failure to
surrender any firearm or license owned or possessed by the
domestic batterer; or
(2) the appropriate law enforcement agency or law
enforcement officer failed to confiscate a firearm or license
eligible for confiscation under this section in a timely manner.
(d) It is not a defense to a prosecution under this section that a
firearm or license subject to confiscation by a law enforcement
agency or law enforcement officer under this section was in the
possession of a third party not specified in the court order
described in section 6.4(a) of this chapter.
(e) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent a
person who is:
(1) the rightful owner of a firearm confiscated under this
section; and
(2) not otherwise disqualified or prohibited from owning or
possessing a firearm under state or federal law;
from reclaiming a confiscated firearm from the law enforcement
agency or law enforcement officer responsible for originally
confiscating the firearm.
SECTION 9. IC 35-47-4-6.4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 6.4. (a) A court, upon entering a judgment of
conviction for domestic battery or a crime of domestic violence,
shall issue a written order that does the following:
(1) Prohibits the defendant from owning or possessing a
firearm.
(2) Requires the defendant to surrender all firearms and
licenses owned or possessed by the defendant.
(3) Orders an appropriate law enforcement:
(A) agency; or
(B) officer;
to confiscate all firearms and all licenses owned or possessed
by the defendant.
(4) Advises the defendant of the rights described in section 7
of this chapter.
(b) A law enforcement agency or law enforcement officer
subject to a written court order described in subsection (a) shall
comply with subsection (a) not later than seventy-two (72) hours
after receipt of the written court order described in subsection (a).
SECTION 10. IC 35-47-4-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.181-2014,
2026 IN 1299—LS 6347/DI 144


SECTION 18, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) Notwithstanding IC 35-47-2, IC 35-47-2.5,
the restoration of the right to serve on a jury under IC 33-28-5-18, the
restoration of the right to vote under IC 3-7-13-5, or the expungement
of a crime of domestic violence under IC 35-38-9, and except as
provided in subsections (b), (c), and (f), a person who has been
convicted of a crime of domestic violence may not possess a firearm.
(b) Not earlier than five (5) years after the date of conviction, a
person who has been convicted of a crime of domestic violence may
petition the court for restoration of the person's right to possess a
firearm. In determining whether to restore the person's right to possess
a firearm, the court shall consider the following factors:
(1) Whether the person has been subject to:
(A) a protective order;
(B) a no contact order;
(C) a workplace violence restraining order; or
(D) any other court order that prohibits the person from
possessing a firearm.
(2) Whether the person has successfully completed a substance
abuse program, if applicable.
(3) Whether the person has successfully completed a parenting
class, if applicable.
(4) Whether the person still presents a threat to the victim of the
crime.
(5) Whether there is any other reason why the person should not
possess a firearm, including whether the person failed to satisfy
a specified condition under subsection (c) or whether the person
has committed a subsequent offense.
(c) The court may condition the restoration of a person's right to
possess a firearm upon the person's satisfaction of specified conditions.
(d) If the court denies a petition for restoration of the right to
possess a firearm, the person may not file a second or subsequent
petition until one (1) year has elapsed after the filing of the most recent
petition.
(e) A person has not been convicted of a crime of domestic violence
for purposes of subsection (a) if the person has been pardoned.
(f) The right to possess a firearm shall be restored to a person whose
conviction is reversed on appeal or on postconviction review at the
earlier of the following:
(1) At the time the prosecuting attorney states on the record that
the charges that gave rise to the conviction will not be refiled.
(2) Ninety (90) days after the final disposition of the appeal or the
2026 IN 1299—LS 6347/DI 144


postconviction proceeding.
(g) If a person's right to possess a firearm is restored under this
section, any:
(1) written court order issued under section 6.4 of this chapter
shall be vacated;
(2) firearm confiscated under section 6.4 of this chapter shall
be:
(A) disposed of; or
(B) returned to the rightful owner;
in the manner described in IC 35-47-3; and
(3) valid license confiscated under section 6.4 of this chapter
shall be made available to the person not later than
seventy-two (72) hours after the person's right to possess a
firearm has been restored.
2026 IN 1299—LS 6347/DI 144